Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2302
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Interstate Trust Company Office Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Branch trust office means an office of a trust company, other than the main or principal office of a trust company, at which a trust company may act in any fiduciary capacity or conduct any activity permitted under the Nebraska Trust Company Act;

(2) Department means the Department of Banking and Finance;

(3) Director means the Director of Banking and Finance;

(4) Fiduciary capacity means a capacity resulting from a trust company undertaking to act alone or jointly with others primarily for the benefit of another in all matters connected with the undertaking and includes the capacities of trustee, including trustee of a common trust fund, administrator, personal representative, guardian of an estate, conservator, receiver, attorney in fact, and custodian and any other similar capacity;

(5) Home state means (a) with respect to a state-chartered trust company, the state in which the trust company is chartered, and (b) with respect to a federally chartered trust company, the state in which the main or principal office of the federally chartered trust company is located;

(6) Home state regulator means the supervisory agency with primary responsibility for chartering and supervising an out-of-state trust company;

(7) Host state means a state, other than the home state of a trust company, in which the trust company maintains, or seeks to establish and maintain, a branch trust office or a representative trust office;

(8) Nebraska state-chartered trust company means (a) a corporation which is chartered to conduct a trust company business and engage in any fiduciary capacity pursuant to the Nebraska Trust Company Act or (b) a corporation which is chartered to conduct a bank in this state pursuant to the Nebraska Banking Act and which has been authorized to conduct a trust company business in the bank pursuant to sections 8-159 to 8-162;

(9) Nebraska trust company means a trust company whose home state is Nebraska;

(10) Out-of-state state trust company means a trust company chartered under the laws of any state other than Nebraska;

(11) Out-of-state trust company means a trust company whose home state is a state other than Nebraska;

(12) Representative trust office means an office at which a trust company does not act in any fiduciary capacity or conduct or engage in any activity related to its fiduciary capacities but may otherwise engage in any other activity permitted under the Nebraska Trust Company Act;

(13) State means any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, any territory of the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, the Virgin Islands, and the Northern Mariana Islands; and

(14) Trust company means (a) a company chartered and supervised under the laws of any state or the United States to act in a fiduciary capacity, (b) a bank chartered and supervised under the laws of any state or the United States if such bank has been further chartered or authorized to conduct a trust company business within the bank, or (c) a savings association chartered and supervised under the laws of any state or the United States if such savings association has been further chartered or authorized to engage in a trust company business within the savings association.

Laws 1998, LB 1321, § 55.

Nebraska Banking Act, see section 8-101.02.

Nebraska Trust Company Act, see section 8-201.01.